Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.057] CHILDREN AND FAMILIES COMMITTEE MEMBERS. new text end new text begin (a) A member of the legislature who serves on a legislative committee with jurisdiction over children and families policy or finance must observe activities at a child care facility for at least 12 hours each biennium. new text end new text begin (b) The house of representatives and the senate must adopt rules to implement this section. new text end